Massachusetts, session 194th, H4312.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2-10 of the charter of the town of Longmeadow, as on file with the
state archivist, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (c) and inserting in place thereof the
following 2 subsections:-
(c) No officer of the town or member of any board, commission or other committee of the
town, whether elected or appointed, and no town or school employee, shall be a member of the
finance committee with the exception of subsection (d) below.
(d) The finance committee shall appoint one member to serve on the Town’s Capital
Planning and Building Committee, pursuant to section 7-7 of the charter .
SECTION 2. Section 3-2 of said charter is hereby amended by adding the following
subsection:-
of 4

(f) Municipal Light Board - The select board shall be the municipal light board of the
town and shall have all the powers and duties given to municipal light boards under Chapter 164
of the Massachusetts General Laws, provided that the select board shall further have the
authority, at their discretion, to appoint a municipal light board in their stead, consisting of three
members, with each member serving a three-year term, such terms to be staggered upon their
initial appointment, with one member initially appointed for one year, one for two years, and one
for three years, and with each subsequent term to be three-years.
SECTION 3. Said charter is hereby further amended by striking out section 7-7 and
inserting in place thereof the following section:
Section 7-7. Capital Planning and Building Committee.
(a) Establishment and Responsibilities
The Capital Planning and Building Committee (CPBC) shall be responsible for receiving
a plan of annual capital improvement projects and needs from the Town Manager. The
committee shall review these projects and capital needs, recommending any adjustments to
funding priorities based on resident input. The capital improvement program submitted by the
Town Manager and any priority adjustments recommended by the CPBC committee shall be
submitted annually to the Select Board. The Select Board shall hold a public hearing on the
capital improvement program before voting on the program and forwarding it to the Finance
Committee alongside the proposed operating budget.
The CPBC shall review and provide comments on the Town Manager’s five-year Capital
Improvement Program.
of 4

(b) Composition and Appointment
The Capital Planning and Building Committee shall consist of seven (7) members, six of
whom shall be appointed by the Select Board for three-year staggered terms. One member shall
be selected from and by the Finance Committee. The composition of the committee shall, to the
extent possible, include individuals with expertise in the following fields: law; architecture; civil,
mechanical, or structural engineering; construction; capital finance or related disciplines.
(c) Capital Plan Contents
The capital improvement program shall include:
1. A clear, concise summary of its contents;
2. A list of all capital improvement projects and needs to be undertaken during the
ensuing five years, with supporting documentation describing the need for each project;
3. Cost estimates, the source of those cost estimates, methods of financing (if
applicable), and recommended time schedules for each project;
4. The estimated annual costs of operating and maintaining each facility and/or major
piece of equipment involved.
(d) Additional Duties Related to Town Buildings
(1) The committee shall advise the Town Manager and Select Board on future needs for
town buildings and review capital projects related to town buildings, including schools.
of 4

(2) The committee shall incorporate aspects of the Long Range Plan into decision-making
and recommendations, including an emphasis on climate adaptation and resiliency efforts in
applicable capital improvement plan submissions.
(e) Policies and Procedures
The committee shall draft policies and procedures that guide its review and approval of
annual capital improvement plan projects. The policies and procedures shall be approved by the
Select Board to ensure efficient and effective operation in fulfilling its duties.
(f) Oversight and Reporting
(1) The committee shall review and monitor the implementation of the Town Manager’s
capital improvement plan and provide annual recommendations to the Select Board on capital
expenditures.
(2) The committee shall ensure that prior years' capital appropriations meet the purposes
for which funds were allocated.
(3) The committee shall review maintenance plans to ensure they align with the long-
term needs of town buildings.
(4) the committee shall receive reports on the status of capital projects and expenditures
and provide updates to the Select Board on progress.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 4